Utah statutes.
78B-5-618.   Patient access to medical records -- Third party access to medical records.

(1)  Pursuant to 45 C.F.R., Parts 160 and 164, Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information, a patient or a patient's personal representative may inspect or receive a copy of the patient's records from a health care provider as defined in Section 78B-3-403, when that health care provider is governed by the provisions of 45 C.F.R., Parts 160 and 164.

(2)  When a health care provider as defined in Section 78B-3-403 is not governed by 45 C.F.R., Parts 160 and 164, Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information, a patient or a patient's personal representative may inspect or receive a copy of the patient's records unless access to the records is restricted by law or judicial order.

(3)  A health care provider who provides a copy of a patient's records to the patient or the patient's personal representative:

(a)  shall provide the copy within the deadlines required by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Administrative Simplification rule, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 164.524(b); and

(b)  may charge a reasonable cost-based fee provided that the fee includes only the cost of:

(i)  copying, including the cost of supplies for and labor of copying; and

(ii)  postage, when the patient or patient representative has requested the copy be mailed.

(4)  Except for records provided by a health care provider under Section 26-1-37, a health care provider who provides a copy of a patient's records to a third party authorized to receive records:

(a)  shall provide the copy within 30 days after receipt of notice; and

(b)  may charge a reasonable fee to cover the health care provider's cost, but may not exceed the following rates:

(i)  $20 for locating a patient's records, per request;

(ii)  copying charges may not exceed 50 cents per page for the first 40 pages and 30 cents per page for each additional page;

(iii)  the cost of postage when the third party has requested the copy be mailed; and

(iv)  any sales tax owed under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.

(5)  Except for records provided under Section 26-1-37, a person authorized to provide medical records, other than a health care provider under Subsections (3) and (4), who provides a copy of a patient's records to a third party authorized to receive records:

(a)  shall provide the copy within 30 days after the request; and

(b)  may charge a reasonable fee to cover the health care provider's cost, but may not exceed the following rates:

(i)  $20 for locating a patient's records, per request;

(ii)  copying charges may not exceed 50 cents per page for the first 40 pages and 30 cents per page for each additional page;

(iii)  the cost of postage when the third party has requested the copy be mailed; and

(iv)  any sales tax owed under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.



Amended by Chapter 33, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 65, 2011 General Session

